Vermont statutes. TITLE 10A Vermont Fish and Wildlife Regulations
Subchapter 2. Seasons, Waters, and Limits
§ 122. Section 122 effective January 1, 2022; see also section 122 effective until January 1, 2022 set out above. Fish Management Regulation.

Authority.

This rule is adopted pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4081(b)
. In adopting this rule, the Fish and Wildlife Board is following the policy established by the General Assembly that the protection, propagation, control, management, and conservation of fish, wildlife
and furbearing animals in this state is in the interest of the public welfare and that the safeguarding of this valuable resource for the people of the state requires a constant and continual vigilance.

In accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4082
, this rule is designed to maintain the best health, population and utilization levels of Vermont’s fisheries.

In accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4083
, this rule establishes open seasons; establishes daily, season, possession limits and size limits; prescribes the manner and means of taking fish; and prescribes the manner of transportation and exportation
of fish.

Purpose.

It is the policy of the State that the protection, propagation control, management and conservation of fish, wildlife, and furbearing animals in this State is in the interest of the public welfare, and that safeguarding of this valuable resource for the
people of the State requires a constant and continual vigilance.

Open-Water Fishing, legal methods of taking fish.

Definitions

Department — Vermont Department of Fish and Wildlife.

Commissioner — Vermont Department of Fish and Wildlife Commissioner.

Open-water fishing — Fishing by means of hook and line in hand or attached to a rod or other device in open water. Fishing by casting or trolling baited hooks, artificial flies or lures is considered open-water fishing.

Baited Hook — A single shank hook with 1, 2, or 3 points which may be baited with natural or artificial bait or both.

Lure — A man-made device designed to catch only 1 fish at a time, to include a spoon, plug, spinner, bait harness, tandem hook streamer or lead head jig.

Fly — A single pointed hook dressed with feathers, hair, thread, tinsel, or any similar material wound on or about the hook to which no hooks, spinners, spoons, or similar devices have been added.

Handheld Spear — A manually powered spear used from above the water’s surface.

Speargun — A pneumatic or rubber band powered device, with a line not to exceed 20 feet attached to a spear, used from below the water’s surface.

Cull Fish — Carp, tench, rudd, shad (alewife and gizzard shad), and goldfish. Additional invasive/exotic fish species may be designated by the Commissioner as “cull fish.”

Immediate Control — Such constant control as would enable the angler to respond forthwith to a fish taking their bait, lure or fly promptly and without any delay.

Snagging — Snagging shall mean the intentional hooking of a fish in a place other than the inside of the fish’s mouth. No person shall pull, jerk or otherwise purposefully and/or repeatedly manipulate a hook, or hooks and line to snag or hook a fish
in any method other than to entice a fish into taking, by mouth, a hook, lure or fly. Repeated and/or exaggerated jerking or pulling of the fishing line and/or hooks in any attempt to snag fish, whether it results in physically
snagging a fish or not, shall be prima facie evidence that snagging has taken place. This shall not apply to the use of a gaff to land a fish that has been legally hooked.

Whether still fishing, casting, or trolling in Vermont waters, a person may take fish only by using not more than two lines over which he or she has immediate control and to each of which lines is attached not more than two baited hooks, or more than
three artificial flies, or more than two lures with or without bait.

A person shall not take any fish pursuant to subsection (3.2) unless it is hooked in the mouth. Any fish taken under subsection (3.2) that is not hooked in the mouth shall be immediately released pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 4602. A fish hooked in any part
of the body other than in the mouth shall be considered to be foul hooked, and shall be prima facie evidence of foul hooking.

Taking or attempting to take fish by snagging is prohibited in all Vermont Waters.

Catch and Release: For species with defined harvest seasons, targeted C&R angling with immediate release can occur outside of harvest season, using artificial lures and flies.

Ice Fishing.

Definitions — The definitions of section 3 are applicable to this section.

Ice Fishing — Ice fishing is defined as fishing by means of hook and line in hand or attached to a rod, tip-up, jack or bob, where the angler is fishing through a hole in the ice, from the ice or on an object supported by the ice. Fishing by casting or
trolling baited hooks, artificial flies or lures shall not be considered ice fishing.

Fish may be taken through the ice with not more than eight lines, except on Lake Champlain where no more than fifteen lines may be operated. Each line shall not have more than two baited hooks, or more than three artificial flies, or more than two lures
with or without bait.

A person ice fishing shall have at all times, immediate control over all lines they operate. A person ice fishing shall be able to visually observe lines they operate. Any line that indicates a fish shall be tended within 30 minutes.

A person shall not take any fish pursuant to subsection (4.2) unless it is hooked in the mouth. Any fish taken under subsection (4.2) that is not hooked in the mouth shall be immediately released pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4602
. A fish hooked in any part of the body other than in the mouth shall be considered to be foul hooked, and shall be prima facie evidence of foul hooking.

Taking or attempting to take fish by snagging is prohibited in all Vermont Waters.

Catch and Release (C&R): For species with defined harvest seasons, targeted C&R angling with immediate release can occur outside of harvest season, using artificial lures and flies.

Lake Champlain Boundaries.

Lake Champlain proper shall be considered to include the setback at the same level and the major tributaries to the lake to the following boundaries:

Dead Creek to Panton Road bridge in Panton;

East Creek to the falls in Orwell (downstream of Mount Independence Road);

Lamoille River to the top of first dam (Peterson Dam) in Milton;

LaPlatte River to the falls in Shelburne (under Falls Road bridge);

Lewis Creek to falls in North Ferrisburgh (just upstream of Old Hollow Road);

Little Otter Creek to falls in Ferrisburgh Center (downstream of Little Chicago Road);

Malletts Creek to the first falls upstream of Roosevelt Highway (US 2 and US 7) in Colchester;

Mill River in Georgia to the falls in Georgia (just upstream of Georgia Shore Road bridge);

Missisquoi River to the top of Swanton Dam in the Village of Swanton;

Mud Creek to the dam in Alburg (just upstream of Route 78 bridge);

Otter Creek to the top of the dam in the city of Vergennes;

Poultney River to Central Vermont Power Dam at Carver Falls in West Haven;

Rock River to first Canadian border crossing;

Winooski River to the Winooski One hydropower dam west of Main Street (US 7) in Winooski and Burlington;

Seasonally Closed Waters.

Lakes and Ponds — The following lakes and ponds or portions thereof are hereby designated seasonally closed waters and shall be closed to all fishing except between Second Saturday in April through October 31:

Bald Hill Pond, Westmore

Beaver Pond, Holland

Beck Pond, Newark

Beebe Pond, Sunderland

Big Mud Pond, Mt. Tabor

Bourn Pond, Sunderland

Branch Pond, Sunderland

Cary Pond, Walden

Cow Mountain Pond, Granby

Duck Pond, Sutton

Forest Lake, Averill

Griffith Lake, Mt. Tabor

Holland Pond, Holland

Jobs Pond, Westmore

Lake Pleiad, Hancock

Levi Pond, Groton

Lewis Pond, Lewis

Little Rock Pond, Wallingford

Long Pond, Westmore

Marl Pond, Sutton

Martins Pond, Peacham

North Pond, Chittenden

Notch Pond, Ferdinand

Noyes (Seyon) Pond, Groton

Perch Pond (Zack Woods Pond), Hyde Park

Pigeon Pond, Groton

Red Mill Pond, Woodford

Silver Lake, Leicester

South America Pond, Ferdinand

South Pond, Marlboro

Spring Lake, Shrewsbury

Stannard Pond, Stannard

Sterling Pond, Cambridge

Stoughton Pond, Weathersfield

Stratton Pond, Stratton

Unknown Pond, Averys Gore

Unknown Pond, Ferdinand

Vail Pond, Sutton

Vernon Hatchery Pond, Vernon

West Mountain Pond, Maidstone

Wheeler Pond, Barton and Sutton

Zack Woods (Perch Pond), Hyde Park

Rivers and Streams — All rivers and streams are hereby designated seasonally closed waters except as listed in all the sections below. For species with defined harvest seasons, targeted C&R angling with immediate release can occur outside of harvest
season, using artificial lures and flies.

Fish — Open Seasons, Size Restrictions and Daily Bag Limits.

Fish of the species named or described in the tables set forth below may be taken:

In the waters specified in column 1, by the method specified in column 2, during the open season specified in column 3.

Provided they meet any size restrictions specified in column 4., and only in numbers listed under daily bag limits specified in column 5., under no circumstances may a person take in one day, more than the daily bag or weight limit from a listed body
of water. No person may take in aggregate more than the daily State-wide aggregate limit for any species listed.

Businesses may buy lawfully taken fish, with the approval of Commissioner, pursuant to the Commercial angling rules set forth in 10 V.S.A. App. 123.

Possession limits are equal to twice the daily bag limits. Fish species with limit restrictions may not be possessed in excess of the possession limits at any time.

No person shall have live fish in their possession that are transported in a manner which attempts to keep them alive when leaving waters of the State (

10 V.S.A. § 1251(13)
), except as follows:

a person may transport approved baitfish species pursuant to the baitfish rules set forth in 10 V.S.A. App. § 141.

the person has been issued a scientific collection permit by the Commissioner which specifically approves of the activity,

the person has been issued a fish transportation permit by the Commissioner which specifically approves of the activity,

the person has been issued a fish breeders permit or fish importation permit by the Commissioner which specifically approves of the activity.

The daily bag limit for a fish species on a water body with a closed season for that fish species is zero during the closed season.

“General waters” restrictions are the provisions applicable to all waters of the State, except the waters specifically named or described.

Unless otherwise specifically provided, fish not listed in this regulation may be taken at any time and without size or catch limit, in waters not listed as seasonally closed waters in Section 6 of these regulations.

Open Seasons, Size Restrictions and Daily Bag Limits Tables

STATEWIDE AGGREGATE DAILY BAG LIMITS (Maximum number of a fish species that may be taken in one day)

Click to view

BROOK, BROWN AND RAINBOW TROUT

TROPHY TROUT STREAMS

Click to view

RAINBOW TROUT (Including STEELHEAD) / BROWN TROUT

Click to view

BROOK, BROWN, RAINBOW, LAKE TROUT AND SALMON — 2 FISH AGGREGATE LIMITS

Click to view

LAKE TROUT AND SALMON

Click to view

SPECIAL REGULATION TROUT STREAMS

Click to view

ANADROMOUS ATLANTIC SALMON

Click to view

AMERICAN SHAD

Click to view

BOWFIN, REDHORSE SUCKER (MULLET), LONGNOSE GAR.

Click to view

SUCKER (LONGNOSE AND WHITE), and CULL FISH

Click to view

BULLHEAD

Click to view

NORTHERN PIKE

Click to view

CHAIN AND REDFIN PICKEREL

Click to view

MUSKELLUNGE

Click to view

SMELT

Click to view

BLACK AND WHITE CRAPPIE

Click to view

YELLOW PERCH

Click to view

LARGEMOUTH AND SMALLMOUTH BASS

Click to view

WALLEYE

Click to view

SAUGER

Click to view

Spawning grounds for game fish generally.

The below listed waters are declared spawning grounds for game fish and are hereby closed to the taking of fish from second Saturday in April through May 31 annually.

Chittenden County

Joiner Brook, Bolton — From the confluence of the Winooski River upstream approximately 1,900 feet to the first falls.

Pinneo Brook, Bolton — From the confluence of the Winooski River upstream approximately 100 feet to the railroad crossing.

Preston Brook, Bolton — From the confluence of the Winooski River upstream approximately 2,600 feet to the first falls.

Orleans County

Black River, Coventry — From 600 feet below the falls at Old Harman Mill in Coventry upstream to the top of falls at Old Harman Mill in Coventry.

Willoughby River, Orleans — From the downstream edge of bridge on Tarbox Hill Road in Orleans Village upstream to the top of the natural falls upstream of the bridge on Tarbox Hill Road in Orleans Village.

Dorin, Wells, Myers, Schoolhouse and Mill Brooks, all in Westmore — From mouth of brooks at Lake Willoughby upstream approximately 3/4 mile in Dorin Brook, all of Wells Brook, 1/2 mile in Myers Brook, 1/4 mile in the Schoolhouse Brook and 1/4 mile in
Mill Brook and tributaries, all in Westmore. For identification purpose these brooks are arranged in order from north to south, and flow through Vermont Agency of Transportation structures on Route 5A number 10, 9,
8, 7 and 6, respectively.

Porter Brook, Greensboro — From Caspian Lake upstream to its headwaters. (1987, Fish and Wildlife Commissioner’s Reg. No. 970, eff. April 1, 1987.)

Washington County

Chase Brook — From its confluence with the Dog River upstream approximately 1/2 mile to the top of the natural falls in Berlin.

Ridley Brook, Duxbury — From the confluence of the Winooski River upstream approximately 1,700 feet to the first falls.

Windsor County

Lilliesville Brook, Stockbridge — From its confluence with the White River upstream to the 2nd bridge on the Lilliesville Brook Road.

Locust Creek, Bethel — From its confluence with the White River upstream to the 2nd bridge on Rt. 12.

The below named waters are closed from March 16 through May 31.

The below named waters are closed from March 16 to the Friday before the 1st Saturday in May, both dates inclusive:

The below named waters are closed to fishing year-round:

The below named water is only open to fishing using artificial flies and lures from September 1 to October 31. All salmon caught must be released. Lake Trout may be harvest during this period. The daily limit is 2 lake trout with a minimum length of 18
inches

Clyde River — From Lake Memphremagog upstream to Charleston Dam (Lubber Lake), West Charleston

The below named water is catch and release for trout from Second Saturday in April to October 31. All trout must be immediately released.

The below named water is catch and release for trout with artificial lures and flies only, anglers less than 15 years old may use live bait from Second Saturday in April to October 31. All trout must be immediately released.

The below named waters are closed to fishing from November 1 to the Friday before the second Saturday in April.

7.1, 7.2, 7.2.1, and 8.4 amended generally.

FISH SPECIES DAILY AGGREGRATE LIMITS Brook and Brown and Rainbow Trout — Streams/ Rivers Maximum Combination of 8 fish Brook and Brown and Rainbow Trout — lakes and ponds Maximum Combination of 6 fish Lake Trout 2 fish, (3 if taken from Lake Champlain)
Salmon 2 fish Large and Smallmouth Bass Maximum combination of 5 fish Northern Pike 5 fish Chain Pickerel 10 fish Muskellunge 0 fish Walleye 3 fish Black and White Crappie 25 fish American Shad 0 fish Yellow Perch 50 fish Yellow Perch
exception Lake Champlain — No daily limit Sauger 0 fish Sturgeon 0 fish

Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit Lakes and Ponds Open-water and ice fishing Second Saturday in April through October 31 January 1, through March 15 No restriction 6 trout Lake Champlain Open-water and ice fishing
No closed season Minimum length of 12 inches 3 trout Rivers and Streams Open-water fishing Second Saturday in April through October 31 No restriction 8 trout Sherman Reservior, Whitingham Open-water fishing Second Saturday in April
through October 31 No restriction 6 trout

Click to view

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit Listed Below: Open-water fishing Second Saturday in April through October 31 No restriction 2 trout in aggregate along Rt. 131 in Weathersfield and Cavendish, - from Downers covered
bridge upstream (approximately 4 miles) to the next bridge across the river, The Howard Hill Bridge. Black River in Rutland City — From the confluence with Otter Creek upstream (approximately 2.7 miles) to the top of the Patch Dam
in Rutland City. East Creek From the downstream edge of the bridge on Route 104 in the Village of Fairfax upstream (approximately 1.6 miles) to the top of the Fairfax Falls Dam in Fairfax. Lamoille River — From the confluence with
Winooski River in Waterbury upstream to the top of the Waterbury Reservoir Dam in Waterbury. Little River in Enosburg and Sheldon — From the downstream edge of Kane Road (TH-3) bridge upstream (approximately 5.7 miles) to the top of
the Enosburg Falls Dam in Enosburg Falls. Missisquoi River in Danby and Mt. Tabor — From the Vermont Railway Bridge north of the fishing access upstream (approximately 2 miles) to the Danby-Mt. Tabor Forest Rd. Bridge (Forest Road
# 10). Otter Creek in the Village of St. Johnsbury — From the top of the Gage Dam in St. Johnsbury upstream (approximately 2.4 miles) to the top of the Arnold Falls Dam. Passumpsic River — From the confluence with the Passumpsic River
upstream (approximately 350 feet) to the downstream edge of the Concord Avenue bridge in the Village of St. Johnsbury. Moose River in Shaftsbury and Bennington—From the Vermont/New York border in Shaftsbury upstream to the top of the
former Vermont Tissue Plant Dam (downstream of Murphy Road) in Bennington. Walloomsac River in Duxbury and Waterbury — From the top of the Bolton Dam in Duxbury and Waterbury upstream to the Route 2 Bridge (east side of Waterbury Village).
Winooski River

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit Listed Below: Open-water fishing Second Saturday in April through October 31 Minimum length of 10 inches 2 trout Orleans County: Barton River — From Lake Memphremagog upstream to the
downstream side of the US Route 5 bridge southernmost and closest to the Village of Barton in Barton. Black River — From Lake Memphremagog upstream to the downstream side of the VT Route 14 / 58 bridge in Irasburg. Browning Branch
of the Willoughby River — From its confluence at the Willoughby River extending upstream to the second road crossing on Brownington Chilafonx Road (TH #15). Crossing is located approximately 2.4 miles from Browington Center on Chilafoux
Road (TH #15). Johns River — From the downstream edge of the first bridge (culvert) upstream of Lake Memphremagog on North Derby Road (TH #6) upstream to U.S. 5, in Derby. Willoughby River — The entire Willoughby River, from confluence
with Barton River in Barton upstream to the Willoughby Lake outlet in Westmore. Rivers and Streams:

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit Listed below: Open-water and Ice fishing Second Saturday in April through October 31 January 1 through March 15 See regulations for specific bodies of waters Two fish in aggregate
Big Averill Lake, Norton and Averill Caspian Lake, Greensboro Crystal Lake, Barton East Long Pond, Woodbury Echo Lake, Charleston Elligo Lake, Craftsbury and Greensboro Forest Lake (Nelson Pond), Calais and Woodbury Harveys Lake, Barnet
Jobs Pond, Westmore (Seasonally Closed) Lake Dunmore, Salisbury Lake Memphremagog (including South Bay), Coventry, Derby, Newport City and Newport Little Averill Lake, Averill Maidstone Lake, Maidstone Martins Pond, Peacham (Seasonally
Closed) Nelson Pond (Forest Lake), Calais and Woodbury Nichols Pond, Woodbury Seymour Lake, Morgan Shadow Lake, Glover Spring Lake, Shrewsbury Sunset Lake, Benson Willoughby Lake, Westmore.

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit General Waters (except as listedbelow) Open-waterand ice fishing SecondSaturday inApril throughOctober 31January 1through March15 Salmon -Minimumlength of 17inches LakeTrout -Minimumlength
of 18inches 2 Lake Trout or 2Salmon or 1of each LakeChamplain Open-waterand ice fishing No ClosedSeason Lake Trout andSalmon -Minimumlength of 15inches 3 Lake Troutand 2 Salmon Clyde Pond,Derby LittleSalem Lake,Derby SalemLake, DerbyClyde
Riverfrom LakeMemphremagogupstream toCitizen’sCharleston Dam(Lubber Lake),West Charleston Open-waterfishing SecondSaturday inApril throughAugust 31 Lake Trout -Minimumlength of 18inches Salmon -Minimumlength of 17inches 2 Lake Trout
or2 Salmon or 1of each LakeMemphremagog(includingSouth Bay) Open-waterand ice fishing SecondSaturday inApril throughOctober 31 January 1through March15 Lake Trout -Minimumlength of 18inches Salmon -Minimumlength of 17inches 2 Lake
Trout or2 Salmon or 1of each Listed Below: Open-waterfishing SecondSaturday inApril throughOctober 31 Lake Trout—Minimumlength of 18inchesSalmon -Minimumlength of 17inches 2 Lake Trout or2 Salmon or 1of each Orleans County:Barton River
— From Lake Memphremagog upstream to the downstream side ofthe US Route 5 bridge southernmost and closest to the Village of Bartonin Barton.Black River — From Lake Memphremagog upstream to the downstream side of theVT Route 14 / 58
bridge in Irasburg.Johns River — From the downstream edge of the first bridge (culvert) upstream ofLake Memphremagog on North Derby Road (TH #6) upstream to U.S. 5,in Derby.Willoughby River — The entire Willoughby River, from confluence
withBarton River in Barton upstream to the Willoughby Lake outlet inWestmore.

1. Waters 2. Method 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit From the confluence with Lilliesville Brook in Stockbridge downstream 3.3 miles to 220 ft. downstream of the confluence with Cleveland Brook in Bethel. White River — Open-water fishing,
with artificial lures and flies only. Second Saturday in April through October 31. Minimum length of 18 inches 1 trout Winooski River Tributaries — Listed Below Open-water fishing June 1 through October 31 10 to 16 inches protected
slot: (all fish 10 to 16 inches must be released) 2 trout, only 1 greater than 16 inches Winooski River Tributaries — From the confluence of the Winooski River upstream approximately 1900 feet to the first falls. Joiner Brook, Bolton
— From the confluence of the Winooski River upstream approximately 100 feet to the railroad crossing. Pinneo Brook, Bolton — From the confluence of the Winooski River upstream approximately 2600 feet to the first falls. Preston Brook,
Bolton — From the confluence of the Winooski River upstream approximately 1700 feet to the first falls. Ridley Brook, Duxbury Listed Below: Open-water fishing Second Saturday in April through October 31 10 to 16 inches protected slot:
(all fish 10 to 16 inches must be released) 2 trout, only 1 greater than 16 inches — From Munger Street Bridge in New Haven upstream (approximately 4.1 miles) to the South Street bridge in Bristol. New Haven River — From the downstream
edge of the Route 153 bridge in Pawlet upstream (approximately 16 miles) to the downstream edge of first bridge on Dorset Hollow Road and including tributary: Flower Brook upstream (approximately 1000ft) to the downstream edge of the
Route 30 bridge in Pawlet. Mettawee River — From Preston Brook mouth upstream (approximately 4.4 miles) to the Ridley Brook mouth. Winooski River Listed below: Open-water fishing Second Saturday in April through September 30 No size
restriction. 8 trout Zero, all trout must be immediately released. Open-water fishing October 1, through October 31 All trout must be immediately released. In towns of Manchester and Dorset from the downstream side of Depot Street
Bridge (Route 11/30) in Manchester upstream (approximately 5.0 miles) to the downstream side of the US Route 7 Bridge south of East Dorset. Batten Kill (East Branch) — In the towns of Arlington and Sandgate from its confluence with
Batten Kill upstream (approximately 8.5 miles) to the confluence with Moffitt Hollow Brook in Beartown. Green River — In the towns of Arlington and Sunderland from its confluence with the Batten Kill upstream (approximately 3.0 miles)
to the downstream side of the Bridge #14 on Sunderland TH# 3 in East Kansas. Roaring Branch In the town of Arlington from its Confluence with the Roaring Branch upstream (approximately 0.8 miles) to the base of the so-called Hale Company
Dam in East Arlington. Warm Brook —

1. Waters 2. Method 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit Connecticut River and tributaries No person shall take or attempt to take an anadromous Atlantic salmon, any salmon unintentionally taken shall be immediately released in accordance
with section 4602 No open season All fish must be immediately released Zero — All Anadromous Atlantic salmon must be immediately released

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit Connecticut River, including Vermont river tributaries Open-water fishing No closed season All shad must be released. Zero — All shad must be immediately released.

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit General Waters (and as listed below) Open-water and ice fishing No closed season No restriction No more than 5 of any one species General Waters (Except seasonally closed waters and
as listed below Speargun, bow and crossbow all with line attached to arrow No closed season No restriction No more than 5 of any one species Lake Champlain, not to include tributaries Open-water and ice fishing, speargun, bow and crossbow
all with line attached to arrow No closed season No restriction No more than 5 fish of any one species Lake Champlain, not to include tributaries Shooting and Handheld Spear March 25 through May 25, Title 10 4606(e) No restriction
No more than 5 of any one species

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit General Waters (and as listed below) Open-water and ice fishing No closed season No restriction No Limit General Waters (Except seasonally closed waters and as listed below) Speargun,
bow and crossbow all with line attached to arrow No Closed Season No restriction No Limit Lake Champlain, not to include tributaries Open-water and ice fishing, speargun, bow and crossbow all with line attached to arrow No closed season
No restriction No Limit Lake Champlain, not to include tributaries Shooting and Handheld Spear March 25 through May 25, Title 10 4606(e) No restriction No Limit

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit General Waters (and as listed below) Open-water and ice fishing No closed season No restriction No Limit Lake Champlain, not to include tributaries Open-water and ice fishing No closed
season No restriction No Limit Lake Champlain, not to include tributaries Shooting and Handheld Spear March 25 through May 25, Title 10 4606(e) No restriction No Limit

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit General Waters (except as listed below) Open-water and ice fishing No closed season Minimum length of 20 inches 5 Fish Lake Champlain Open-water and ice fishing No closed season Minimum
length of 20 inches 5 Fish Shooting and handheld spearing March 25 through May 25, 10 VSA 4606 Minimum length of 20 inches 5 Fish

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limits General Waters (except as listed below) Open-water and ice fishing No closed season No restriction No Limit Lake Champlain Open-water and ice fishing No closed season No restriction
10 fish Shooting and handheld spearing March 25 through May 25 No restriction 10 fish

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limits General Waters (except as listed below) Open-water and ice fishing; Catch and release with artificial lures and flies only No closed season All muskellunge must be released Zero -
All muskellunge must be immediately released Lake Champlain Open-water and ice fishing; Catch and release with artificial lures and flies only No closed season All muskellunge must be released Zero - All muskellunge must be immediately
released Shooting and handheld spearing March 25 through May 25, 10 VSA 4606(e) Zero Fish

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit All waters Open-water and ice fishing No closed season No restriction No limit

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limits All waters Open-water and ice fishing No closed season Minimum length of 8 inches 25 fish, Combined

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limits General Waters (except as listed below) Open-water and ice fishing No closed season No restriction 50 fish Lake Champlain Open-water and ice fishing No closed season No restriction
No Limit Businesses may buy lawfully taken fish, with the approval of the Commissioner, pursuant to the Commercial angling rule set forth in 10 V.S.A. APP § 123.

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit General Waters (except as listed below) Open-water and ice fishing Second Saturday in June through March 15. Minimum length of 10 inches 5 fish Lake Champlain Open-water fishing Second
Saturday in June through Nov. 30 Minimum length of 12 inches 5 fish Lakes, Ponds and reservoirs (seasonally closed) Open-water fishing Second Saturday in June through October 31. Minimum length of 10 inches 5 Fish Lakes, Ponds and
reservoirs (seasonally closed) Open-water fishing: Catch and release with artificial lures and flies only Second Saturday in April through the Friday before the Second Saturday in June, both dates inclusive. All bass must be released
Zero — All bass must be immediately released Lake Morey, Fairlee Open-water and ice fishing Second Saturday in June through March 15 Minimum length of 14 inches 5 Fish Listed below: Open-water fishing Second Saturday in June through
Nov. 30. Minimum length of 10 inches 5 fish Catch and release with artificial lures and flies only Dec. 1 through the Friday before the second Saturday in June, both dates inclusive All bass must be released Zero — All bass must be
immediately released. Austin Pond, Hubberton Black Pond, Hubberton Blueberry Lake (Warren Lake), Warren Breese Pond, Hubberton Bullhead Pond, Manchester Gale Meadows, Londonderry Half Moon Pond, Hubberton Lily Pond, Vernon Lowell Lake,
Londonderry Mill Pond, Windsor Raponda Lake, Wilmington Retreat Meadows, Brattleboro Roach Pond, Hubberton Runnemede Lake, Windsor Sadawga, Whitingham Weatherhead Hollow, Guilford

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit General Waters and Lake Champlain (except as listed below) Open-water and ice fishing First Saturday in May through March 15 Minimum length of 18 inches 3 Fish Lake Carmi, Franklin
Open-water and ice fishing First Saturday in May through March 15 Minimum length of 15 inches Protected lengths — 17 to 19 inches (all fish between 17 & 19 inches must be released) 5 fish, provided only 1 is over 19 inches Chittenden
Reservoir, Chittenden including all tributaries upstream to the first barrier impassable to upstream fish movement Open-water and ice fishing June 1 through March 15 Minimum length of 22 inches 2 fish

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit General Waters and Lake Champlain Open-water and ice fishing No open season Any fish taken must be immediately released. Zero — All Sauger taken must be immediately released.

HISTORY:
Added

1961, No. 119
, § 2, eff. May 9, 1961; amended 1963, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. —, eff. Aug. 23, 1963; 1966, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. —, eff. Jan. 1, 1967; 1968, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. —, eff. Jan. 1, 1969; 1971, Fish and
Game Board Reg. No. 840, eff. March 19, 1971; 1971, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. —, eff. June 21, 1971; 1973, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 866, eff. Jan. 20, 1973; 1974, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 892, eff. Dec. 26, 1974; 1975, Fish
and Game Board Reg. No. 895, eff. Jan. 1, 1976; 1976, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 899, eff. Jan. 1, 1977; 1977, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 904, § 5, eff. Jan. 1, 1978;

1977, No. 245
(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Apr. 17, 1978; 1978, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 906, eff. Oct. 21, 1978; 1979, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 913, eff. Nov. 21, 1979; 1980, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 915, eff. June 30, 1980;
1980, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 926, §§ 1-7, eff. Jan. 1, 1981; 1983, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 936, §§ 1, 5, eff. Jan. 1, 1983; 1983, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 942, eff. June 9, 1983; 1983, Fish and Game Board Reg. No. 946,
eff. Oct. 17, 1983; 1984, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 950, eff. Sept. 17, 1984; 1984, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 951, eff. Sept. 17, 1984;

1985, No. 953
, eff. Jan. 1, 1985;

1985, No. 49
;

1986, No. 962
, eff. June 6, 1986; 1987, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 971, eff. Sept. 17, 1987; 1990, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 980, eff. Feb. 23, 1990; 1991, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 982, eff. Jan. 5, 1991; 1991,
Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 990, eff. Sept. 1991; 1993, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 998, eff. March 23, 1993; 1995, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1003, eff. Jan. 2, 1996; 1997, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1003, eff.
Nov. 1, 1997; 1999, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1003, eff. March 13, 1999; 2000 Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1003, eff. Oct. 7, 2000; 2003, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1003, eff. Dec. 6, 2002; 2004, Fish and Wildlife
Board Reg. No. 1003, eff. June 4, 2004; 2005, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1003, eff. July 21, 2005; 2005A, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1003, eff. March 31, 2006; 2007, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1003, eff. Sept. 1,
2006; 2008, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 1003, eff. Jan. 1, 2009; 2010 Fish and Wildlife Reg. effective Jan. 1, 2011; 2013 Fish and Wildlife Reg. eff. Jan. 1, 2014; 2015 Fish and Wildlife Reg. eff. Jan. 1, 2016; 2017 Fish and Wildlife
Reg. eff. Jan. 1, 2018; 2018 Fish and Wildlife Reg. eff. Jan. 1, 2019; 2021 Fish and Wildlife Reg. eff. Jan. 1, 2022.

§ 123.
Commercial Angling Rule.

Authority.

This rule is adopted pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4083
and

10 V.S.A. § 4611
. This rule implements the policy established by the General Assembly that the protection, propagation, control, management, and conservation of fish, wildlife and furbearing animals in this State is in the interest
of the public welfare and that the safeguarding of this valuable resource for the people of the State requires a constant and continual vigilance.

In accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4083
and

10 V.S.A. § 4611
this rule establishes requirements related to purchase and sale of fish including, but not limited to, prohibiting fish species, seasons, limits, reporting requirements and possible permit requirements.

Purpose.

The purpose of this rule is to:

Establish the conditions for anglers to sell legally harvested approved fish species.

Establish the process and requirements for businesses and/or individuals to purchase fish legally harvested by anglers.

Establish a list of fish species in addition to those listed in

10 V.S.A. § 4611
that are prohibited for sale by anglers.

Definitions.

Angler — Any person engaged in the take or attempted take of fish, by any method.

Buyer — Any person engaged in the purchase of fish harvested within this state.

Legally Harvested — Any fish species harvested by any lawful methods approved under the provisions of this part.

Seller — Any person engaged in the sale of fish harvested within this State.

Selling Fish.

No angler shall sell fish species which are not legally harvestable or are listed in

10 V.S.A. § 4611
or in Section 6.0 of this rule.

Anglers shall provide information about their commercial fishing activity to the Department as required by the Commissioner.

Buying Fish.

No person or business shall buy fish for resale without a Fish Buyer Permit issued by the Commissioner.

No person or business shall buy fish species which are not legally harvestable or are listed in

10 V.S.A. § 4611
or in Section 6.0 of this rule.

A Fish Buyer Permit shall be effective from January 1 through December 31.

A holder of Fish Buyer Permit must submit quarterly reports as required by the Commissioner. Reports shall include but not limited to pounds purchased for each size group by species (Jan-Mar; April-June; July-Sep; Oct-Dec). The reports will include information
from all species purchased. Additionally, the percentage of purchased amount from Lake Champlain shall be broken out and reported separately.

The Fish Buyer’s reports shall be submitted within 30 days of the last day of the quarter (March 31, June 30, September 30, December 31).

The Fish Buyer Permit provides Fish Buyer an exemption from specific creel/possession limits. This exemption to creel and possession limits is restricted to the address specified above under “Business Location”, which is defined as an established immobile
place of business (not directly on the ice or on any public waters or public access areas), and the transport of legally bought and/or sold fish within the State of Vermont, from the Permitted Fish Buyer’s Business Location.

Failure to comply with these rules, including submission of quarterly reports, may result in the revocation of a Fish Buyer Permit.

List of Species Prohibited for sale and purchase.

• Species listed in

10 V.S.A. § 4611
.

HISTORY:
Added 2017, Fish and Wildlife Regs, eff. Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 124.
Valley Brook—Spawning waters.

Pursuant to the provisions of

10 V.S.A. § 4140
, the below named waters are declared spawning grounds for game fish and are hereby closed to the taking of fish from October 1 to October 31. =font8

Orleans County

Valley Brook—Tributary to Seymour Lake is to be closed in its entirety.

HISTORY:
Added 1986, Fish and Wildlife Commissioner’s Reg. No. —, eff. Oct. 1, 1986.

§§ 125,
126.
Repealed.

§ 127.
Repealed.

§ 128.
Repealed.

§§ 129,
130.
Repealed.

§ 131.
Repealed.

§ 132.
Repealed.

§ 133.
Expired.

§ 134.
Repealed. 1995, Fish and Wildlife Commissioner’s Reg. No. 986.

§ 135.
Expired.

§ 136.
Repealed.

§ 137.
Fishing tournaments.

The permit for a fishing tournament as required by

10 V.S.A. § 4613
shall be applied for no less than 30 days before the date of the tournament. The following information will be supplied to the Vermont Fish and Wildlife Department:

Name of Organization, contact person(s), address and phone number(s), dates and times of the tournament, body of water, location of headquarters and check stations, number of anglers expected, fish species involved, a copy of the tournament rules, name
and address permit is to be mailed to.

Within 30 days after the tournament ends a report of the following information shall be provided to the Department:

Total number of tickets sold, estimated number of anglers, number of anglers that registered catch, number of each species of fish registered, and the number of registered fish released alive following registration.

Tournament sponsors may be requested to cooperate further with the Department in gathering additional information.

All tournaments rules shall be structured within the laws of the State of Vermont. A fishing license is required by anyone 15 years of age and older. All legal fishing methods and limits shall apply.

HISTORY:
1994, Fish and Wildlife Commissioner’s Reg. No. 1005, eff. Feb. 13, 1994.